Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.450

Certain offers and acquisitions prohibited.

No person for a period of three years following the date of the conversion may directly or indirectly offer to acquire or acquire the beneficial ownership of more than ten percent of any class of an equity security of any savings bank converted in accordance with this chapter without the prior written approval of the director of financial institutions.

[ 1994 c 92 s 396; 1981 c 85 s 89.]